Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-5801.01
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby
finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to make revisions in
Nebraska's tax structure in order to increase research and development in
Nebraska.

Laws 2014, LB836, § 5.